Utah statutes.
49-20-406.   Insurance benefits for employees' beneficiaries.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Children" includes stepchildren and legally adopted children.

(b)  "Line-of-duty death" means a death resulting from external force or violence occasioned by an act of duty as an employee.

(2)  The beneficiary of a covered individual who is employed by the state and who has a line-of-duty death shall receive:

(a)  the proceeds of a $50,000 group term life insurance policy paid for by the state and administered and provided as part of the group life insurance program under this chapter; and

(b)  group health coverage paid for by the state that covers the covered individual's:

(i)  surviving spouse until remarriage or becoming eligible for Medicare, whichever comes first; and

(ii)  unmarried children up to the age of 26.

(3) A covered employer not required to provide the benefits under Subsection (2) may provide either or both of the benefits under Subsection (2) by paying rates established by the program.

(4)  The benefit provided under Subsection (2)(a) is subject to the same terms and conditions as the group life insurance program provided under this chapter.

